Mississippi, session 2026, HB4126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Debra Denise Thomas of Hinds County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of her conviction for the crime of Shoplifting in Warren County, on August 31, 1998, for which she was sentenced to serve three (3) years suspended and five (5) years probation under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  During her release to probation, she violated probation, and it was revoked.  On May 25, 2000, as a result of her revocation, she was sentenced to serve three (3) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. She was released from custody on July 22, 2002.  The Legislature is informed that she has since conducted herself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.